Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-2,251.01
Limited food vending machine, defined.

Limited food vending machine shall mean a vending machine which does not dispense time/temperature control for safety food.

Laws 1999, LB 474, § 5;

Laws 2016, LB798, § 6.